Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6031SV (1) 91 mb/jh S.F. 2319 Section 1. Section 279.70A, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 279.70A Student identification cards ââ suicide Suicide 3 prevention information. 4 1. A public school that issues identification cards to 5 students in grades seven through twelve shall include on either 6 side of the identification card the crisis hotline telephone 7 and text numbers and the internet address for your life Iowa 8 or the your life Iowa successor program. A public school that 9 issues identification cards to students in grades five and 10 six may include on either side of the identification card the 11 crisis hotline telephone and text numbers and the internet 12 address for your life Iowa or the your life Iowa successor 13 program. 14 2. A public school that provides instruction to students in 15 grades seven through twelve shall publish information on the 16 your life Iowa or the your life Iowa successor program as a 17 resource on the schoolâs internet site. 18